lt-LT: Vidinio pamušalo medžiaga: Dirbtinė oda; Dirbtinė zomša; Veltinis; Lininis audinys; Mikropluoštas; Be pamušalo; Satinas; Šilkas; Zomša; Aksomas; Kita
zh-CN: 内部衬里材料: 人造皮革; 人造麂皮; 毛毡; 亚麻; 超细纤维; 无内衬; 缎; 丝绸; 小牛皮; 天鹅绒; 其他
es: Material del forro interior: Cuero sintético; Gamuza sintética; Fieltro; Lino; Microfibra; Sin forro; Satinado; Seda; Gamuzado; Terciopelo; Otros
vi: Chất liệu lót bên trong: Da giả; Da lộn giả; Nỉ; Lanh; Vải xơ vi mảnh; Không có lớp lót; Satin; Lụa; Da lộn; Nhung; Khác
ja: 内装裏地素材: フェイクレザー; 合成スエード; フェルト; リネン; マイクロファイバー; 裏地なし; サテン; シルク; スエード; ベルベット; その他
sk-SK: Materiál vnútornej výstelky: Umelá koža; Umelý semiš; Plsť; Ľan; Mikrovlákno; Bez podšívky; Satén; Hodváb; Semiš; Zamatový; Iné
nl: Materiaal binnenbekleding: Kunstleer; Kunstsuède; Vilt; Linnen; Microvezel; Geen voering; Satijn; Zijde; Suède; Fluweel; Andere
nb: Innvendig fôrmateriale: Kunstig lær; Kunstsemsket skinn; Filt; Lin; Mikrofiber; Ingen fôring; Sateng; Silke; Semsket; Fløyel; Annet
de: Innenfuttermaterial: Kunstleder; Kunstwildleder; Filz; Leinen; Mikrofaser; Kein Futter; Seidenmatt; Seide; Wildleder; Samt; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Materijal unutarnje obloge: Umjetna koža; Umjetna antilop koža; Filc; Lan; Mikrovlakna; Bez postave; Saten; Svila; Antilop; Baršun; Ostalo
it: Materiale del rivestimento interno: Ecopelle; Camoscio sintetico; Feltro; Lino; Microfibra; Senza fodera; Raso; Seta; Pelle scamosciata; Velluto; Altro
cs: Materiál vnitřního obložení: Nepravá kůže; Umělý semiš; Plst; Len; Mikrovlákno; Bez podšívky; Satén; Hedvábí; Semiš; Samet; Jiné
zh-TW: 內襯材料: 人造皮; 人造麂皮; 毛氈; 亞麻; 超細纖維; 無內襯; 緞面布; 絲綢; 麂皮; 天鵝絨; 其他
ru: Материал внутренней обивки: Искусственная кожа; Искусственная замша; Фетр; Лен; Микрофибра; Без подкладки; Сатин; Шелк; Замша; Бархат; Другой
th: วัสดุบุภายใน: หนังเทียม; หนังกลับเทียม; ผ้าสักหลาด; ผ้าลินิน; ไมโครไฟเบอร์; ไม่มีซับใน; กระดาษเนื้อซาติน; ผ้าไหม; หนังกลับ; ผ้ากำมะหยี่; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Материал на вътрешната облицовка: Изкуствена кожа; Изкуствен велур; Филц; Лен; Микрофибър; Без облицовка; Сатен; Коприна; Набук; Кадифе; Други
da: Indvendigt foringmateriale: Kunstigt læder; Kunstruskind; Filt; Linned; Mikrofiber; Ingen foring; Satin; Silke; Ruskind; Fløjl; Andet
fi: Sisävuorauksen materiaali: Keinonahka; Tekomokka; Huopa; Pellava; Mikrokuitu; Ei vuorta; Satiini; Silkki; Mokka; Sametti; Muu
tr: İç astar malzemesi: Suni deri; Suni süet; Keçe; Keten; Mikrofiber; Astarsız; Saten; İpek; Süet; Kadife; Diğer
sl-SI: Material notranje obloge: Umetno usnje; Umetno semiš; Filc; Lan; Mikrovlakna; Brez podloge; Saten; Svilnat; Semiš; Žamet; Drugo
pl: Materiał wyściółki wewnętrznej: Skaj; Sztuczny zamsz; Filc; Bielizna pościelowa; Mikrofibra; Bez wyściółki; Satyna; Jedwab; Zamsz; Aksamit; Inne
ro-RO: Material căptușeală interioară: Imitație de piele; Piele întoarsă artificială; Pâslă; In; Microfiber; Fără căptușeală; Satin; Mătase; Piele întoarsă; Catifea; Altele
ko: 내부 안감 재료: 인조 가죽; 인조 스웨이드; 펠트; 린넨; 극세사; 안감 없음; 새틴; 실크; 스웨이드; 벨벳; 기타
el: Υλικό εσωτερικής επένδυσης: Συνθετικό δέρμα; Συνθετικό σουέντ; Τσόχα; Λινό; Μικροΐνες; Χωρίς επένδυση; Σατέν; Μετάξι; Καστόρι; Βελούδο; Άλλο
pt-BR: Material do forro interno: Couro falso; Camurça sintética; Sentido; Linho; Microfibra; Sem forro; Cetim; Seda; Camurça; Veludo; Outro
fr: Matériau de doublure intérieure: Faux cuir; Suède synthétique; Feutre; Lin; Microfibre; Sans doublure; Satin; Soie; Suède; Velours; Autre
en: Interior lining material: Faux leather; Faux suede; Felt; Linen; Microfiber; No lining; Satin; Silk; Suede; Velvet; Other
sv: Inre fodermaterial: Fuskläder; Konstmocka; Filt; Linne; Mikrofiber; Inget foder; Satin; Silke; Mocka; Sammet; Övrigt
hu: Belső bélés anyaga: Műbőr; Művelúr; Filc; Lenvászon; Mikroszálas; Nincs bélés; Szatén; Selyem; Szarvasbőr; Bársony; Egyéb
pt-PT: Material do forro interno: Couro falso; Camurça sintética; Feltro; Linho; Microfibra; Sem forro; Acetinado; Seda; Camurça; Veludo; Outro